Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1676.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Nursing Shortage Assistance Program Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicant." An entity that applies for a grant under section 3."Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Educational institution." An entity licensed by the Department of Education to award a degree in nursing that 1234567891011121314151617 prepares students to become registered nurses."Hospital." As defined in section 802.1 of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act."Nursing degree." A degree issued by an educational institution for completion of a nursing program accredited by the Pennsylvania State Board of Nursing."Partner hospital." A hospital that has entered into a contractual relationship with a qualified nursing servicer and meets all of the following:(1) Provides loan repayment assistance to nurses employed by the hospital.(2) Agrees to provide non-State sourced matching funds for nurse loan repayment assistance equal to at least 100% of the grant amount made available by the qualified nursing servicer."Program." The Nursing Shortage Assistance Program established under section 3."Qualified nursing servicer." An entity that does all of the following:(1) Contracts with multiple educational institutions, prospective nursing students and hospitals in a manner that promotes greater access to education and career opportunities.(2) Maintains a place of business in this Commonwealth.(3) Contracts with multiple hospitals within this Commonwealth to coordinate agreements between prospective nursing students and hospitals in a manner that facilitates the repayment of student loan expenses incurred by the prospective nursing students.20250HB1676PN2045 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Has experience in supporting educational institutions, including marketing, recruiting, student support, clinical placement, learning design and application of technology."Recipient." An applicant that has been awarded a grant under section 3.Section 3. Nursing Shortage Assistance Program.(a) Establishment.--The Nursing Shortage Assistance Program is established within the department. The program shall provide grants to qualified nursing servicers to assist nursing students with securing postgraduation employment and the repayment of student loan expenses incurred while obtaining a degree in nursing from educational institutions located within this Commonwealth.(b) Application.--A qualified nursing servicer may apply to the department for a grant under this section. The application shall be in a form and manner determined by the department, which, at a minimum, shall include all of the following:(1) The name and address of the applicant.(2) The name and address of the partner hospital that is providing employment opportunities to prospective nurses.(3) The number of prospective nurses that will receive loan repayments from the grant if awarded to the qualified nursing servicer.(c) Awarding of grants.--(1) All applications received during an application period shall be reviewed and evaluated by the department. In awarding a grant under this section, the department shall consider all of the following:(i) The number of timely and complete applications 20250HB1676PN2045 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 received by the department during the application period.(ii) The anticipated number of students that would receive loan repayments under the grant application.(iii) The anticipated number of students of each nursing degree type that would receive loan repayments under the grant application.(iv) The anticipated geographic distribution of students receiving loan repayments under the grant application.(v) The plans for ongoing support to maximize the chances of success for the nurses once employed.(2) Upon determining that the applicant has met all program requirements, the department may approve a grant application.(d) Grant agreements.--If the department approves an application under subsection (c), the department and the recipient shall enter into a grant agreement, which, at a minimum, shall include all of the following:(1) The name and address of the partner hospital that is partnering with the recipient to administer the program funded under the grant.(2) The number of prospective nurses that will receive tuition reimbursements under the grant.(3) A commitment by the partner hospital to use all matching funds first before applying State grant funds when repaying tuition expenses incurred by nurses who become employees of the partner hospital.(e) Award.--Upon execution of the grant agreement required by subsection (d), the department shall award the applicant a grant.20250HB1676PN2045 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4. Restrictions.(a) Limitations.--The following limitations shall apply to grant funds awarded under section 3:(1) A recipient may not use any grant money awarded for administrative costs.(2) A subgrantee partner hospital may not use any grant money made available from a recipient for administrative costs.(3) A subgrantee partner hospital shall use all available matching funds before utilizing grant funds for nurse loan repayment assistance.(4) An individual nurse employed by a partner hospital may not receive more than $10,000 per year, or $30,000 in the aggregate, of grant money for loan repayment assistance for a degree in nursing.(b) Unencumbered funds.--Any grant funds that remain unencumbered after three years shall be returned to the Commonwealth by the recipient.Section 5. Department guidelines, application period and grant awards.(a) Written guidelines.--Within 30 days of the effective date of this subsection, the department shall develop written guidelines for the implementation of this act.(b) Application period.--In any fiscal year in which funds are made available for the program, the department shall open an application period of not more than 30 days to receive applications under section 3.(c) Grant awards.--For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, the department shall make grant awards under section 3 within 30 days of the close of the application period for that 20250HB1676PN2045 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 fiscal year.Section 6. Report to General Assembly.No later than December 31, 2026, and each year thereafter, the Secretary of Labor and Industry shall submit a report to the General Assembly summarizing the effectiveness of the grants provided by this act. The report shall include the names of all partner hospitals involved in the program as of the date of the report and the number of potential nurses that would receive tuition reimbursement under the program. The report shall be submitted to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives, the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Labor and Industry Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Labor and Industry Committee of the House of Representatives.Section 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1676PN2045 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718